North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-60.2 Workforce Development Grant for Tribally Controlled Community Colleges

54-60.2-01.
Establishment of workforce development grant for tribally controlled community colleges.

There is established within the division of workforce development of the department of commerce a program to provide workforce development grants to tribally controlled community colleges in North Dakota. A tribally controlled community college in this state may apply to the department of commerce for a job training grant in such manner as the department of commerce prescribes. The department of commerce shall consult with the executive director of the Indian affairs commission to determine eligible tribally controlled community colleges and shall award grants based on the documented job placement rates at each eligible college.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 1; 2013, ch. 49, § 22; 2017, ch. 376, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 49, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-60.2-01 was created and amended by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 1 of chapter 437, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2218; and section 22 of chapter 49, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2018.

54-60.2-02.
Purpose of grants.

Any grant awarded under section 54-60.2-01 may be used at the discretion of the college:

For development of programs that assist in providing certificates or degrees to North Dakota students attending the college that qualify the student to obtain jobs for which applicants are being sought within the state, as identified by the department of commerce, job service North Dakota, or any of the federally recognized Indian tribes within North Dakota; or

To assist any North Dakota student attending the college to establish, or to assist in establishing, a new business operating within North Dakota that will employ North Dakota citizens.

Any funds provided to tribally controlled community colleges must be used to supplement, not supplant, any existing program or funding source of the college.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 2; 2015, ch. 429, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 376, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 429, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 429, S.L. 2015 provides, “

EXPIRATION DATE

. This Act is effective through July 31, 2017, and after that date is ineffective.”

54-60.2-03.
Cooperation and collaboration with other agencies.

To the maximum extent possible, a tribally controlled community college that receives a grant under this chapter must endeavor to cooperate, collaborate, or partner with other tribal, state, or federal agencies or institutions that are providing economic development assistance or workforce training and development within the state, and the department of commerce shall assist in facilitating such cooperation and partnerships.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 3.

54-60.2-04.
Use of grants.

A grant awarded under this chapter may be used to carry out the purposes specified in section 54-60.2-02, including maintenance and operation of the program; development costs associated with any new or redesigned courses of instruction at the college; costs of instruction, including special programs for individuals with disabilities; and academic instruction and associated materials.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 4.

54-60.2-05.
Reports to the department of commerce.

On an annual basis, within sixty days of the end of each fiscal year of the biennium for which funds are appropriated under this chapter, each tribally controlled community college receiving a grant under this chapter shall provide to the department of commerce, in the form prescribed by the department, the following information:

A detailed report of expenditures under the grant;

The number of students assisted by the grant;

The graduation rate of students assisted by the grant and the graduation rate for all students at the college;

A description of any new or improved training or other program leading to a certificate or a degree which was developed by the college with funds provided by the grant and the types of jobs for which the new or improved training program is designed;

The placement rate of graduates of the college assisted by the grant in relation to the placement rate of all graduates of the college;

The rate of students assisted by the grant who pursue further educational opportunities immediately after graduation from the college; and

The number of jobs or businesses created as a result of funds provided by the grant.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 5.